District of Columbia statutes.
29-413.06

Exception to notice requirement.

(a)

Whenever notice would otherwise be required to be given under any provision of this chapter to a member, the notice need not be given if notice of 2 consecutive annual meetings, and all notices of meetings during the period between such 2 consecutive annual meetings, have been returned undeliverable or could not be delivered.

(b)

If a member delivers to the nonprofit corporation a notice setting forth the member’s then-current address, the requirement that notice be given to that member shall be reinstated.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History